District of Columbia statutes.
16-4603.02

Enforcement under Hague Convention.

Under this subchapter, a court of the District may enforce an order for the return of the child made under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction as if it were a child-custody determination.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(d), 48 DCR 2214
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 302 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (1997 Act).